District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.80

Dissolution of corporation — Effect of statement of intent to dissolve.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 214, ch. 269, § 80
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.80.
1981 Ed., § 29-380.
1973 Ed., § 29-930d.